Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1562
Modular housing unit; local codes or standards; compliance not required; exception; site development, defined.

No agency or political subdivision of the state or a municipality shall require compliance with local codes or standards for the construction of or the installation of structural, plumbing, heating, or electrical systems in a modular housing unit which are different from those established by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act. An agency or political subdivision of this state or a municipality may prescribe reasonable and necessary requirements of the site development for modular housing units in accordance with local standards. Site development is defined for the purposes of such act as those local development requirements including, but not limited to, foundations, site utility requirements and their connections to the modular housing units, zoning and subdivision regulations, and fire control provisions.

Laws 1976, LB 248, § 8;

Laws 1984, LB 822, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 96.